Washington statutes.
RCW 15.14.045

Compliance agreements authorized—Suspension or cancellation—Hearing.

The director may enter into compliance agreements with any grower of foundation, registered, or certified planting stock for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter. The director may suspend or cancel any compliance agreement for cause. Upon notice by the director to suspend or cancel a compliance agreement, a person may request a hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 1999 c 144 s 5.]